Tennessee, session 114, HB1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-304(a), is amended by deleting
the language "may extend for not to exceed thirty (30) days" and substituting instead "may
extend for not to exceed forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1361
003278
- 1 -